Tennessee, session 114, SB2648.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-19-108(c), is amended by
deleting "ten (10) days" and substituting instead "fifteen (15) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2648
012566
- 1 -